Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-937
Failure to report.

A person violates the False Medicaid Claims Act, and is subject to civil liability as provided in section 68-936, if such person is a beneficiary of an inadvertent submission of a false medicaid claim to the state, and subsequently discovers and, knowing the claim is false, fails to report the claim to the department within sixty days of such discovery. The beneficiary is not obliged to make such a report to the department if more than six years have passed since submission of the claim.

Laws 2004, LB 1084, § 4;

R.S.Supp.,2004, § 68-1076;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 37.